Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Priority.
§ 8.9A-336.
Commingled goods.

“Commingled goods.” In this section, “commingled goods” means goods that are physically united with other goods in such a manner that their identity is lost in a product or mass.

No security interest in commingled goods as such. A security interest does not exist in commingled goods as such. However, a security interest may attach to a product or mass that results when goods become commingled goods.

Attachment of security interest to product or mass. If collateral becomes commingled goods, a security interest attaches to the product or mass.

Perfection of security interest. If a security interest in collateral is perfected before the collateral becomes commingled goods, the security interest that attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) is perfected.

Priority of security interest. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), the other provisions of this part determine the priority of a security interest that attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c).

Conflicting security interests in product or mass. If more than one security interest attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c), the following rules determine priority:

a security interest that is perfected under subsection (d) has priority over a security interest that is unperfected at the time the collateral becomes commingled goods.

if more than one security interest is perfected under subsection (d), the security interests rank equally in proportion to the value of the collateral at the time it became commingled goods.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-337.
Priority of security interests in goods covered by certificate of title.

If, while a security interest in goods is perfected by any method under the law of another jurisdiction, this Commonwealth issues a certificate of title that does not show that the goods are subject to the security interest or contain a statement that they may be subject to security interests not shown on the certificate:

a buyer of the goods, other than a person in the business of selling goods of that kind, takes free of the security interest if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the goods after issuance of the certificate and without knowledge of the security interest; and

the security interest is subordinate to a conflicting security interest in the goods that attaches, and is perfected under §

8.9A-311 (b)

, after issuance of the certificate and without the conflicting secured party’s knowledge of the security interest.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-338.
Priority of security interest or agricultural lien perfected by filed financing statement providing certain incorrect information.

If a security interest or agricultural lien is perfected by a filed financing statement providing information described in §

8.9A-516 (b)

(5) which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed:

the security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to a conflicting perfected security interest in the collateral to the extent that the holder of the conflicting security interest gives value in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information; and

a purchaser, other than a secured party, of the collateral takes free of the security interest or agricultural lien to the extent that, in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information, the purchaser gives value and, in the case of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a security certificate, receives delivery of the collateral.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 twice inserted “tangible” in subdivision (2).

§ 8.9A-339.
Priority subject to subordination.

This title does not preclude subordination by agreement by a person entitled to priority.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-316; 2000, c. 1007.